Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 31. Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact of 1966.
§ 33.2-3100.
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact of 1966.

§ 3

Whereas, Maryland, Virginia and the District of Columbia heretofore have entered into the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact (Virginia—Ch. 627, 1958 Acts of Assembly; Maryland—Ch. 613, Acts of General Assembly 1959; District of Columbia—Resolution of the Board of Commissioners adopted December 22, 1960), with the consent of the Congress (J.R., September 15, 1960, P.L., 86-794, 74 Stat. 1031, as amended by 76 Stat. 764), as a first step toward the improvement of transit service in the metropolitan area of Washington, D.C.;

Whereas, in said Compact each of the Signatories pledged to each of the other signatory parties faithful cooperation in the solution and control of transit and traffic problems within said metropolitan area and, in order to effect such purposes, agreed to enact any necessary legislation to achieve the objectives of the Compact to the mutual benefit of the citizens living within said metropolitan area and for the advancement of the interests of the Signatories;

Whereas, it has been established by a decade of studies that a regional system of improved and expanded transit facilities, including grade-separated rail facilities in congested areas, is essential in said metropolitan area for the satisfactory movement of people and goods, the alleviation of present and future traffic congestion, the economic welfare and vitality of all parts of the area, the effectiveness of the departments and agencies of the federal government located within the area, the orderly growth and development of the District of Columbia and the Maryland and Virginia portions of the area, the comfort and convenience of the residents of and visitors to the area, and the preservation of the beauty and dignity of the Nation’s Capital;

Whereas, the Congress has authorized Maryland, Virginia and the District of Columbia to negotiate a Compact for the establishment of an organization empowered to provide necessary transit facilities (P.L. 86-669, 74 Stat. 537) and in said legislation declared the policy, inter alia, that the development and administration of such transit facilities requires (1) cooperation among the federal, state and local government of the area, (2) financial participation by the federal government in the creation of major facilities that are beyond the financial capacity or borrowing powers of the private carriers, the District of Columbia and the local governments of the area, and (3) coordination of transit facilities with other public facilities and with the use of land, public and private;

Whereas, private transit companies should be utilized to the extent practicable in providing the regional transit facilities and services, consistent with the requirements of the public interest that the publicly and privately owned facilities be operated as a coordinated regional system without unnecessary duplicating services;

Whereas, adequate provision should be made for the protection of transit labor in the development and operation of the regional system;

Whereas, adequate provisions should be made to eliminate any requirement of additional authentication of manual signature of bonds guaranteed by the United States of America; and

Whereas, it is hereby determined that an Authority to be created by interstate compact between the District of Columbia, the State of Maryland and the Commonwealth of Virginia, is the most suitable form of organization to achieve the stated objectives;

Now, therefore, the District of Columbia, the State of Maryland and the Commonwealth of Virginia, hereinafter referred to as Signatories, do hereby amend the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact by adding thereto Title III, as hereinafter set forth, and do hereby covenant and agree substantially, as follows:

Title III

Article I Definitions

Definitions

As used in this Title, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Board” means the Board of Directors of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority;

“Director” means a member of the Board of Directors of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority;

“Private transit companies” and “private carriers” means corporations, persons, firms or associations rendering transit service within the Zone pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission or by a franchise granted by the United States or any Signatory party to this Title;

“Signatory” means the State of Maryland, the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District of Columbia;

“State” includes District of Columbia;

“Transit facilities” means all real and personal property located in the Zone, necessary or useful in rendering transit service between points within the Zone, by means of rail, bus, water or air and any other mode of travel, including, without limitation, tracks, rights-of-way, bridges, tunnels, subways, rolling stock for rail, motor vehicle, marine and air transportation, stations, terminals and ports, areas for parking and all equipment, fixtures, buildings and structures and services incidental to or required in connection with the performance of transit service;

“Transit services” means the transportation of persons and their packages and baggage by means of transit facilities between points within the Zone including the transportation of newspapers, express and mail between such points, and charter service which originates within the Zone but does not include taxicab service or individual-ticket-sales sightseeing operations;

“Transit Zone” or “Zone” means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Zone created and described in Section 3 as well as any additional area that may be added pursuant to Section 83(a) of this Compact; and

“WMATC” means Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission.

Article II Purpose and Functions

Purpose

The purpose of this Title is to create a regional instrumentality, as a common agency of each Signatory party, empowered, in the manner hereinafter set forth, (1) to plan, develop, finance and cause to be operated improved transit facilities, in coordination with transportation and general development planning for the Zone, as part of a balanced regional system of transportation, utilizing to their best advantage the various modes of transportation, (2) to coordinate the operation of the public and privately owned or controlled transit facilities, to the fullest extent practicable, into a unified regional transit system without unnecessary duplicating service, and (3) to serve such other regional purposes and to perform such other regional functions as the Signatories may authorize by appropriate legislation.

Article III Organization and Area

Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Zone

There is hereby created the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Zone which shall embrace the District of Columbia, the Cities of Alexandria, Falls Church and Fairfax and the Counties of Arlington, Fairfax and Loudoun and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth of Virginia located within those counties, and the counties of Montgomery and Prince George’s in the State of Maryland and political subdivisions of the State of Maryland located in said counties.Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority

There is hereby created, as an instrumentality and agency of each of the Signatory parties hereto, the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority which shall be a body corporate and politic, and which shall have the powers and duties granted herein and such additional powers as may hereafter be conferred upon it pursuant to law.Board Membership

The Authority shall be governed by a Board of eight Directors consisting of two Directors for each Signatory and two for the federal government (one of whom shall be a regular passenger and customer of the bus or rail service of the Authority). For Virginia, the Directors shall be appointed by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission; for the District of Columbia by the Council of the District of Columbia; for Maryland, by the Washington Suburban Transit Commission; and for the federal government, by the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation. For Virginia and Maryland, the Directors shall be appointed from among the members of the appointing body, except as otherwise provided herein, and shall serve for a term coincident with their term on the appointing body. A Director for a Signatory may be removed or suspended from office only as provided by the law of the Signatory from which he was appointed. The nonfederal appointing authorities shall also appoint an alternate for each Director. In addition, the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation shall also appoint two nonvoting members who shall serve as the alternates for the federal Directors. An alternate Director may act only in the absence of the Director for whom he has been appointed an alternate, except that, in the case of the District of Columbia where only one Director and his alternate are present, such alternate may act on behalf of the absent Director. Each alternate, including the federal nonvoting Directors, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. In the event of a vacancy in the office of Director or alternate, it shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment.

Before entering upon the duties of his office each Director and alternate director shall take and subscribe to the following oath (or affirmation) of office or any such other oath or affirmation, if any, as the Constitution or laws of the Government he represents shall provide:“I, _______________ , hereby solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and Laws of the state or political jurisdiction from which I was appointed as a Director (alternate director) of the Board of Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and will faithfully discharge the duties of the office upon which I am about to enter.”Compensation of Directors and Alternates

Members of the Board and alternates shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred as an incident to the performance of their duties.Organization and Procedure

The Board shall provide for its own organization and procedure. It shall organize annually by the election of a Chairman and Vice-Chairman from among its members. Meetings of the Board shall be held as frequently as the Board deems that the proper performance of its duties requires and the Board shall keep minutes of its meetings. The Board shall adopt rules and regulations governing its meeting, minutes and transactions.Quorum and Actions by the Board

Four Directors or alternates consisting of at least one Director or alternate appointed from each Signatory, shall constitute a quorum and no action by the Board shall be effective unless a majority of the Board present and voting, which majority shall include at least one Director or alternate from each Signatory, concur therein; provided, however, that a plan of financing may be adopted or a mass transit plan adopted, altered, revised or amended by the unanimous vote of the Directors representing any two Signatories.

The actions of the Board shall be expressed by motion or resolution. Actions dealing solely with internal management of the Authority shall become effective when directed by the Board, but no other action shall become effective prior to the expiration of thirty days following its adoption; provided, however, that the Board may provide for the acceleration of any action upon a finding that such acceleration is required for the proper and timely performance of its functions.Officers

The officers of the Authority, none of whom shall be members of the Board, shall consist of a general manager, a secretary, a treasurer, a comptroller, an inspector general, and a general counsel and such other officers as the Board may provide. Except for the office of general manager, inspector general, and comptroller, the Board may consolidate any of such other offices in one person. All such officers shall be appointed and may be removed by the Board, shall serve at the pleasure of the Board and shall perform such duties and functions as the Board shall specify. The Board shall fix and determine the compensation to be paid to all officers and, except for the general manager who shall be a full-time employee, all other officers may be hired on a full-time or part-time basis and may be compensated on a salary or fee basis, as the Board may determine. All employees and such officers as the Board may designate shall be appointed and removed by the general manager under such rules of procedure and standards as the Board may determine.

The general manager shall be the chief administrative officer of the Authority and, subject to policy direction by the Board, shall be responsible for all activities of the Authority.

The treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds of the Authority, shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements and shall make payments only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the Chairman or Vice-Chairman of the Board, or other person authorized by the Board to do so, and by the secretary or general manager; provided, however, that the Board may provide that warrants not exceeding such amounts or for such purposes as may from time to time be specified by the Board may be signed by the general manager or by persons designated by him.

The inspector general shall report to the Board and head the Office of the Inspector General, an independent and objective unit of the Authority that conducts and supervises audits, program evaluations, and investigations relating to Authority activities; promotes economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in Authority activities; detects and prevents fraud and abuse in Authority activities; and keeps the Board fully and currently informed about deficiencies in Authority activities as well as the necessity for and progress of corrective action.

An oath of office in the form set out in § 5 (b) of this Article shall be taken, subscribed and filed with the Board by all appointed officers.

Each Director, officer and employee specified by the Board shall give such bond in such form and amount as the Board may require, the premium for which shall be paid by the Authority.Conflict of Interest

No Director, officer or employee shall:

be financially interested, either directly or indirectly, in any contract, sale, purchase, lease or transfer of real or personal property to which the Board or the Authority is a party;

in connection with services performed within the scope of his official duties, solicit or accept money or any other thing of value in addition to the compensation or expenses paid to him by the Authority;

(3a)

offer money or any thing of value for or in consideration of obtaining an appointment, promotion or privilege in his employment with the Authority.

Any Director, officer or employee who shall willfully violate any provision of this section shall, in the discretion of the Board, forfeit his office or employment.

Any contract or agreement made in contravention of this section may be declared void by the Board.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the applicability of any federal or state law which may be violated by any action prescribed by this section.

Article IV Pledge of Cooperation

Each Signatory pledges to each other faithful cooperation in the achievement of the purposes and objects of this Title.

Article V General Powers

Enumeration

In addition to the powers and duties elsewhere described in this Title, and except as limited in this Title, the Authority may:

Sue and be sued;

Adopt and use a corporate seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations respecting the exercise of the powers conferred by this Title;

Construct, acquire, own, operate, maintain, control, sell and convey real and personal property and any interest therein by contract, purchase, condemnation, lease, license, mortgage or otherwise but all of said property shall be located in the Zone and shall be necessary or useful in rendering transit service or in activities incidental thereto;

Receive and accept such payments, appropriations, grants, gifts, loans, advances and other funds, properties and services as may be transferred or made available to it by any Signatory party, any political subdivision or agency thereof, by the United States, or by any agency thereof, or by any other public or private corporation or individual, and enter into agreements to make reimbursement for all or any part thereof;

Enter into and perform contracts, leases and agreements with any person, firm or corporation or with any political subdivision or agency of any Signatory party or with the federal government, or any agency thereof, including, but not limited to, contracts or agreements to furnish transit facilities and service;

Create and abolish offices, employments and positions (other than those specifically provided for herein) as it deems necessary for the purposes of the Authority, and fix and provide for the qualification, appointment, removal, term, tenure, compensation, pension and retirement rights of its officers and employees without regard to the laws of any of the Signatories;

Establish, in its discretion, a personnel system based on merit and fitness and, subject to eligibility, participate in the pension and retirement plans of any Signatory, or political subdivision or agency thereof, upon terms and conditions mutually acceptable;

Contract for or employ any professional services;

Control and regulate the use of facilities owned or controlled by the Authority, the service to be rendered and the fares and charges to be made therefor;

Hold public hearings and conduct investigations relating to any matter affecting transportation in the Zone with which the Authority is concerned and, in connection therewith, subpoena witnesses, papers, records and documents; or delegate such authority to any officer. Each Director may administer oaths or affirmations in any proceeding or investigation;

Make or participate in studies of all phases and forms of transportation, including transportation vehicle research and development techniques and methods for determining traffic projections, demand motivations, and fiscal research and publicize and make available the results of such studies and other information relating to transportation;

Exercise, subject to the limitations and restrictions herein imposed, all powers reasonably necessary or essential to the declared objects and purposes of this Title; and

Establish regulations providing for public access to Board records.

Article VI Planning

Mass Transit Plan

The Board shall develop and adopt, and may from time to time review and revise, a mass transit plan for the immediate and long-range needs of the Zone. The mass transit plan shall include one or more plans designating (1) the transit facilities to be provided by the Authority, including the locations of terminals, stations, platforms, parking facilities and the character and nature thereof; (2) the design and location of such facilities; (3) whether such facilities are to be constructed or acquired by lease, purchase or condemnation; (4) a timetable for the provision of such facilities; (5) the anticipated capital cost; (6) estimated operating expenses and revenues relating thereto; and (7) the various other factors and considerations, which, in the opinion of the Board, justify and require the projects therein proposed. Such plan shall specify the type of equipment to be utilized, the areas to be served, the routes and schedules of service expected to be provided and probable fares and charges therefor.

In preparing the mass transit plan, and in any review or revision thereof, the Board shall make full utilization of all data, studies, reports and information available from the National Capital Transportation Agency and from any other agencies of the federal government, and from Signatories and the political subdivisions thereof.Planning Process

The mass transit plan, and any revisions, alterations or amendments thereof, shall be coordinated, through the procedures hereinafter set forth, with

other plans and programs affecting transportation in the Zone in order to achieve a balanced system of transportation, utilizing each mode to its best advantage;

the general plan or plans for the development of the Zone; and

the development plans of the various political subdivisions embraced within the Zone.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of each member of the Board to serve as liaison between the Board and the body which appointed him to the Board. To provide a framework for regional participation in the planning process, the Board shall create technical committees concerned with planning and collection and analyses of data relative to decision-making in the transportation planning process and the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia, the component governments of the Northern Virginia Transportation District and the Washington Suburban Transit District shall appoint representatives to such technical committees and otherwise cooperate with the Board in the formulation of a mass transit plan, or in revisions, alterations or amendments thereof.

The Board, in the preparation, revision, alteration or amendment of a mass transit plan, shall

consider data with respect to current and prospective conditions in the Zone, including, without limitation, land use, population, economic factors affecting development plans, goals or objectives for the development of the Zone and the separate political subdivisions, transit demands to be generated by such development, travel patterns, existing and proposed transportation and transit facilities, impact of transit plans on the dislocation of families and businesses, preservation of the beauty and dignity of the Nation’s Capital, factors affecting environmental amenities and aesthetics and financial resources;

cooperate with and participate in any continuous, comprehensive transportation planning process cooperatively established by the highway agencies of the Signatories and the local political subdivisions in the Zone to meet the planning standards now or hereafter prescribed by the Federal-Aid Highway Acts; and

to the extent not inconsistent with or duplicative of the planning process specified in subdivision (2) of this subsection (c), cooperate with the National Capital Planning Commission, the National Capital Regional Planning Council, the Washington Metropolitan Council of Governments, the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission, the highway agencies of the Signatories, the Maryland-National Capital Park and Planning Commission, the Northern Virginia Regional Planning and Economic Development Commission, the Maryland State Planning Department and the Commission of Fine Arts. Such cooperation shall include the creation, as necessary, of technical committees composed of personnel, appointed by such agencies, concerned with planning and collection and analysis of data relative to decision-making in the transportation planning process.Adoption of Mass Transit Plan

Before a mass transit plan is adopted, altered, revised or amended, the Board shall transmit such proposed plan, alteration, revision or amendment for comment to the following and to such other agencies as the Board shall determine:

the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia, the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission and the Washington Suburban Transit Commission;

the governing bodies of the counties and cities embraced within the Zone;

the transportation agencies of the Signatories;

the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission;

the Washington Metropolitan Council of Governments;

the National Capital Planning Commission;

the National Capital Regional Planning Council;

the Maryland-National Capital Park and Planning Commission;

the Northern Virginia Regional Planning and Economic Development Commission;

the Maryland State Planning Department; and

the private transit companies operating in the Zone and the Labor Unions representing the employees of such companies and employees of contractors providing services under operating contracts.

A copy of the proposed mass transit plan, amendment or revision, shall be kept at the office of the Board and shall be available for public inspection. Information with respect thereto shall be released to the public. After thirty days’ notice published once a week for two successive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the Zone, a public hearing shall be held with respect to the proposed plan, alteration, revision or amendment. The thirty days’ notice shall begin to run on the first day the notice appears in any such newspaper. The Board shall consider the evidence submitted and statements and comments made at such hearing and may make any changes in the proposed plan, amendment or revision which it deems appropriate and such changes may be made without further hearing.

Article VII Financing

Policy

With due regard for the policy of Congress for financing a mass transit plan for the Zone set forth in Section 204 (g) of the National Capital Transportation Act of 1960 (74 Stat. 537), it is hereby declared to be the policy of this Title that, as far as possible, the payment of all costs shall be borne by the persons using or benefiting from the Authority’s facilities and services and any remaining costs shall be equitably shared among the federal, District of Columbia and participating local governments in the Zone. The allocation among such governments of such remaining cost shall be determined by agreement among them and shall be provided in the manner hereinafter specified.Plan of Financing

The Authority, in conformance with said policy, shall prepare and adopt a plan for financing the construction, acquisition and operation of facilities specified in a mass transit plan adopted pursuant to Article VI hereof, or in any alteration, revision or amendment thereof. Such plan of financing shall specify the facilities to be constructed or acquired, the cost thereof, the principal amount of revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates and other evidences of debt proposed to be issued, the principal terms and provisions of all loans and underlying agreements and indentures, estimated operating expenses and revenues and the proposed allocation among the federal, District of Columbia and participating local governments of the remaining costs and deficits, if any, and such other information as the Commission may consider appropriate.

Such plan of financing shall constitute a proposal to the interested governments for financial participation and shall not impose any obligation on any government and such obligations shall be created only as provided in § 18 of this Article VII.Commitments for Financial Participation

Commitments on behalf of the portion of the Zone located in Virginia shall be by contract or agreement by the Authority with the Northern Virginia Transportation District, or its component governments, as authorized in the Transportation District Act of 1964 (Ch. 631, 1964 Virginia Acts of Assembly), to contribute to the capital required for the construction and/or acquisition of facilities specified in a mass transit plan adopted as provided in Article VI, or any alteration, revision or amendment thereof, and for meeting expenses and obligations in the operation of such facilities. No such contract or agreement, however, shall be entered into by the Authority with the Northern Virginia Transportation District unless said District has entered into the contracts or agreements with its member governments, as contemplated by § 1 (b)(4) of Article 4 of said Act, which contracts or agreements expressly provide that such contracts or agreements shall inure to the benefit of the Authority and shall be enforceable by the Authority in accordance with the provisions of § 2, Article 5 of said Act, and such contracts or agreements are acceptable to the Board. The General Assembly of Virginia hereby authorizes and designates the Authority as the agency to plan for and provide transit facilities and services for the area of Virginia encompassed within the Zone within the contemplation of Article 1, § 3 (c) of said Act.

Commitments on behalf of the portion of the Zone located in Maryland shall be by contract or agreement by the Authority with the Washington Suburban Transit District, pursuant to which the Authority undertakes to provide transit facilities and service in consideration for the agreement by said District to contribute to the capital required for the construction and/or acquisition of facilities specified in a mass transit plan adopted as provided in Article VI, or in any alteration, revision or amendment thereof, and for meeting expenses and obligations incurred in the operation of such facilities.

With respect to the federal government, the commitment or obligation to render financial assistance shall be created by appropriation or in such other manner, or by such other legislation, as the Congress shall determine. Commitments by the District of Columbia shall be by contract or agreement between the governing body of the District of Columbia and the Authority, pursuant to which the Authority undertakes, subject to the provisions of § 20 hereof, to provide transit facilities and service in consideration for the undertaking by the District of Columbia to contribute to the capital required for the construction and/or acquisition of facilities specified in a mass transit plan adopted as provided in Article VI, or in any alteration, revision or amendment thereof, and for meeting expenses and obligations incurred in the operation of such facilities.

All payments made by the local Signatory governments for the Authority for the purpose of matching federal funds appropriated in any given year as authorized under Title VI, § 601, P.L. 110-432 regarding funding of capital and preventive maintenance projects of the Authority shall be made from amounts derived from dedicated funding sources.

For purposes of this paragraph (d), a “dedicated funding source” means any source of funding that is earmarked or required under state or local law to be used to match federal appropriations authorized under Title VI, § 601, P.L. 110-432 for payments to the Authority.Administrative Expenses

Prior to the time the Authority has receipts from appropriations and contracts or agreements as provided in § 18 of this Article VII, the expenses of the Authority for administration and for preparation of a mass transit and financing plan, including all engineering, financial, legal and other services required in connection therewith, shall, to the extent funds for such expenses are not provided through grants by the federal government, be borne by the District of Columbia, by the Washington Suburban Transit District and the component governments of the Northern Virginia Transportation District. Such expenses shall be allocated among such governments on the basis of population as reflected by the latest available population statistics of the Bureau of the Census; provided, however, that upon the request of any director the Board shall make the allocation upon estimates of population acceptable to the Board. The allocations shall be made by the Board and shall be included in the annual current expense budget prepared by the Board.Acquisition of Facilities from Federal or Other Agencies

The Authority is authorized to acquire by purchase, lease or grant or in any manner other than condemnation, from the federal government or any agency thereof, from the District of Columbia, Maryland or Virginia, or any political subdivision or agency thereof, any transit and related facilities, including real and personal property and all other assets, located within the Zone, whether in operation or under construction. Such acquisition shall be made upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon and subject to such authorization or approval by the Congress and the governing body of the District of Columbia, as may be required; provided, however, that if such acquisition imposes or may impose any further or additional obligation or liability upon the Washington Suburban Transit District, the Northern Virginia Transportation District, or any component government thereof, under any contract with the Authority, the Authority shall not make the acquisition until any such affected contract has been appropriately amended.

For such purpose, the Authority is authorized to assume all liabilities and contracts relating thereto, to assume responsibility as primary obligor, endorser or guarantor on any outstanding revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates or other form of indebtedness authorized in this Act issued by such predecessor agency or agencies and, in connection therewith, to become a party to, and assume the obligations of, any indenture or loan agreement underlying or issued in connection with any outstanding securities or debts.Temporary Borrowing

The Board may borrow, in anticipation of receipts, from any Signatory, the Washington Suburban Transit District, the Northern Virginia Transportation District, or any component government thereof, or from any lending institution for any purposes of this Title, including administrative expenses. Such loans shall be for a term not to exceed two years and at such rates on interest as shall be acceptable to the Board. The Signatories and any such political subdivision or agency may, in its discretion, make such loans from any available money.Funding

The Board shall not construct or acquire any of the transit facilities specified in a mass transit plan adopted pursuant to the provisions of Article VI of this Title, or in any alteration, revision or amendment thereof, nor make any commitments or incur any obligations with respect thereto until funds are available therefor.

Article VIII Budget

Capital Budget

The Board shall annually adopt a capital budget, including all capital projects it proposes to undertake or continue during the budget period, containing a statement of the estimated cost of each project and the method of financing thereof.Current Expense Budget

The Board shall annually adopt a current expense budget for each fiscal year. Such budget shall include the Board’s estimated expenditures for administration, operation, maintenance and repairs, debt service requirements and payments to be made into any funds required to be maintained. The total of such expenses shall be balanced by the Board’s estimated revenues and receipts from all sources, excluding funds included in the capital budget or otherwise earmarked for other purposes.Adoption and Distribution of Budgets

Following the adoption by the Board of annual capital and current expense budgets, the general manager shall transmit certified copies of such budgets to the principal budget officer of the federal government, the District of Columbia, the Washington Suburban Transit District and of the component governments of the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission at such time and in such manner as may be required under their respective budgetary procedures.

Each budget shall indicate the amounts, if any, required from the federal government, the government of the District of Columbia, the Washington Suburban Transit District and the component governments of the Northern Virginia Transportation District, determined in accordance with the commitments made pursuant to Article VII, § 18 of this Title, to balance each of said budgets.Payment

Subject to such review and approval as may be required by their budgetary or other applicable processes, the federal government, the Government of the District of Columbia, the Washington Suburban Transit District and the component governments of the Northern Virginia Transportation District shall include in their respective budgets next to be adopted and appropriate or otherwise provide the amounts certified to each of them as set forth in the budgets.

Article IX Revenue Bonds

Borrowing Power

The Authority may borrow money for any of the purposes of this Title, may issue its negotiable bonds and other evidences of indebtedness in respect thereto and may mortgage or pledge its properties, revenues and contracts as security therefor.All such bonds and evidences of indebtedness shall be payable solely out of the properties and revenues of the Authority. The bonds and other obligations of the Authority, except as may be otherwise provided in the indenture under which they were issued, shall be direct and general obligations of the Authority and the full faith and credit of the Authority are hereby pledged for the prompt payment of the debt service thereon and for the fulfillment of all other undertakings of the Authority assumed by it to or for the benefit of the holders thereof.Funds and Expenses

The purposes of this Title shall include, without limitation, all costs of any project or facility or any part thereof, including interest during a period of construction and for a period not to exceed two years thereafter and any incidental expenses (legal, engineering, fiscal, financial, consultant and other expenses) connected with issuing and disposing of the bonds; all amounts required for the creation of an operating fund, construction fund, reserve fund, sinking fund, or other special fund; all other expenses connected with administration, the planning, design, acquisition, construction, completion, improvement or reconstruction of any facility or any part thereof; and reimbursement of advances by the Board or by others for such purposes and for working capital.Credit Excluded; Officers, State, Political Subdivisions and Agencies

The Board shall have no power to pledge the credit of any Signatory party, political subdivision or agency thereof, or to impose any obligation for payment of the bonds upon any Signatory party, political subdivision or agency thereof, but may pledge the contracts of such governments and agencies; provided, however, that the bonds may be underwritten in whole or in part as to principal and interest by the United States, or by any political subdivision or agency of any Signatory; provided, further, that any bonds underwritten in whole or in part as to principal and interest by the United States shall not be issued without approval of the Secretary of the Treasury. Neither the Directors nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds of the Authority or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.Funding and Refunding
